Mississippi, session 2026, SB2777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 47-7-37.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-37.1.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if a court finds by a preponderance of the evidence, that a probationer or a person under post-release supervision has committed a felony or absconded, the court may revoke his probation and impose any or all of the sentence.  For purposes of this section, "absconding from supervision" means the failure of a probationer to report to his supervising officer for six (6) or more consecutive months. The probation, post-release supervision, or suspension of sentence may also be revoked of anyone who is sentenced to probation, post-release supervision, or suspension of sentence, and commits an offense chargeable as a felony before his probation, post-release supervision, or suspension of sentence has commenced, the same as if it had already commenced. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.